Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:



Req. No. 2202 Page 1


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma Mother


and Child Protection Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.61 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


1. “Abortion” means the use or prescription of any instrument,


medicine, drug, or any other substance or device intentionally to


terminate the pregnancy of a female known to be pregnant with an


intention other than to increase the probability of a live birth, to


preserve the life or health of the child after live birth, to remove


an ectopic pregnancy, or to remove a dead unborn child who died as


the result of a spontaneous miscarriage, accidental trauma, or a


criminal assault on the pregnant female or her unborn child; and


2. “Abortion-inducing drug” means a medicine, drug, or any


other substance prescribed or dispensed with the intent of


terminating the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant, with


knowledge that the termination will with reasonable likelihood cause


the death of the unborn child. This includes the off-label use of


drugs known to have abortion-inducing properties, which are


prescribed specifically with the intent of causing an abortion, such


as mifepristone (Mifeprex), misoprostol (Cytotec), and methotrexate.


This definition does not apply to drugs that may be known to cause

Req. No. 2202 Page 2


an abortion, but which are prescribed for other medical indications,


such as chemotherapeutic agents and diagnostic drugs. The use of


such drugs to induce abortion is also known as “medical”,


“medication”, “RU–486”, “chemical”, “Mifeprex regimen”, or “drug-


induced” abortion.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.62 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act does not apply to and a civil action under this act


may not be brought against a person who manufactures, distributes,


mails, transports, delivers, prescribes, provides, or possesses


abortion-inducing drugs in this state solely for one or more of the


following purposes:


1. Treating a life-threatening medical condition through an


abortion performed under Section 861 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


2. Removing an ectopic pregnancy;


3. Removing a dead, unborn child who died as the result of a


spontaneous miscarriage, accidental trauma, or a criminal assault on


the pregnant female or her unborn child; or


4. A purpose that does not include performing, inducing,


attempting, or assisting an abortion, other than an abortion


performed to preserve the life of a pregnant woman as provided by


Section 861 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 2202 Page 3


B. This act may not be construed to require the actual


performance, inducement, or attempted performance of an abortion in


order for a person to bring a civil action authorized by this act.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.63 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Except as provided by subsection B of this section or


Section 3 of this act, a person may not:


1. Manufacture or distribute an abortion-inducing drug in this


state;


2. Mail, transport, deliver, prescribe, or provide an abortion-


inducing drug in any manner to or from any person or location in


this state; or


3. Aid or abet any person in any of the acts described in


paragraph 1 or 2 of this subsection including, but not limited to,


knowingly providing financial assistance or transport to a person


who intends to engage an act described in paragraph 1 or 2 of this


subsection or otherwise furnishing the means to procure an abortion-


inducing drug in violation of state law.


B. Subsection A of this section does not prohibit:


1. Speech or conduct protected by the First Amendment to the


United States Constitution, as made applicable to the states through


the United States Supreme Court’s interpretation of the Fourteenth


Amendment to the United States Constitution, or protected by Section

Req. No. 2202 Page 4


of Article II of the Oklahoma Constitution;


2. Conduct a pregnant woman engages in during the course of


aborting or attempting to abort the woman’s unborn child;


3. The manufacture, distribution, mailing, transport, delivery,


prescribing, provision, or possession of an abortion-inducing drug


solely for one or more of the purposes described by subsection A of


Section 3 of this act; or


4. Conduct a person engages in under the direction of a federal


agency, contractor, or employee to carry out a duty under federal


law, if prohibiting that conduct would violate the doctrine of


preemption or intergovernmental immunity.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.64 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act may be enforced only through a qui tam action


brought under Section 6 of this act.


B. No other direct or indirect enforcement of this act may be


taken or threatened by this state, a political subdivision of this


state, a district or county attorney, or any officer or employee of


this state or a political subdivision of this state against any


person, by any means whatsoever, except as provided in this act.


C. This section does not preclude or limit the enforcement of


any other law or regulation against conduct that is independently


prohibited by the other law or regulation and that would remain

Req. No. 2202 Page 5


prohibited by the other law or regulation in the absence of this


act.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.65 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person, other than this state, a political subdivision of


this state, or an officer or employee of this state or a political


subdivision of this state, has standing to bring and may bring a qui


tam action against a person who:


1. Violates Section 4 of this act; or


2. Intends to violate Section 4 of this act.


B. An action brought under this section shall be brought in the


name of the qui tam relator, who is an assignee of this state’s


claim for relief. Notwithstanding any other law, the transfer of


this state’s claim to the qui tam relator is absolute, with the


state retaining no interest in the subject matter of the claim.


C. A qui tam relator may not bring an action under this section


if the action is preempted by 47 U.S.C., Section 230(c).


D. A qui tam action may not be brought under this section:


1. Against a woman for using, obtaining, or seeking to obtain


abortion-inducing drugs to abort or attempt to abort her unborn


child;


2. Against a person acting under the direction of a federal


agency, contractor, or employee who is carrying out a duty under

Req. No. 2202 Page 6


federal law if the imposition of liability would violate the


doctrine of preemption or intergovernmental immunity;


3. By any person who:


a. impregnated a woman through conduct constituting


sexual assault under Section 112 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


b. committed an offense for which an affirmative finding


of domestic abuse was made under Section 644 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes,


c. provided an abortion-inducing drug to a pregnant woman


for the purpose of performing, inducing, or attempting


an abortion without the woman’s consent or knowledge,


d. has been convicted of an offense under Section 1173 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or


e. acts in concert or participation with a person


described by this subdivision;


4. Against a transportation network company (TNC) or a TNC


driver for using a transportation network company’s digital network


to provide a prearranged ride. As used in this paragraph, the terms


“transportation network company (TNC)”, “TNC driver”, “digital


network”, and “prearranged ride” have the same meanings as provided


by Section 1011 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. Against a courier application service (CAS) or a CAS driver


for using a delivery network company’s digital network to provide

Req. No. 2202 Page 7


courier service. As used in this paragraph, the terms “courier


application service (CAS)”, “CAS driver”, “digital network”, and


“courier service” have the same meanings as provided by Section 1071


of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. Against a person to whom this act does not apply and against


whom a civil action under this act may not be brought under


subsection A of Section 3 of this act;


7. Against a health care provider, unless the qui tam relator


pleads and proves that the provider engaged in conduct constituting


a violation of Section 4 of this act while located outside this


state; or


8. Against a pharmaceutical manufacturer, pharmaceutical


distributor, or common carrier, including an air carrier conducting


domestic or flag operations under 14 C.F.R., Part 121 or a foreign


air carrier conducting scheduled operations under 14 C.F.R., Part


129, unless the qui tam relator pleads and proves that the defendant


failed to adopt and implement a policy to not distribute, mail,


transport, deliver, provide, or possess abortion-inducing drugs


other than for one or more of the purposes described by subsection A


of Section 3 of this act.


E. Notwithstanding any other law, including rules of civil


procedure adopted under Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes, an action


brought under this section may not be litigated on behalf of a


claimant class or a defendant class, and a court may not certify a

Req. No. 2202 Page 8


class in the action.


F. A person may bring an action under this section not later


than the sixth anniversary of the date the cause of action accrues.


G. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any waiver or


purported waiver of the right to sue under this section shall be


void as against public policy, and shall not be enforceable in any


court.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.66 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. It is an affirmative defense to an action brought under


Section 6 of this act that the defendant:


1. Was unaware the defendant was engaged in the conduct


prohibited under Section 4 of this act; and


2. Took reasonable precautions to ensure the defendant would


not violate Section 4 of this act.


B. It is an affirmative defense to an action brought under


Section 6 of this act that:


1. The imposition of civil liability on the defendant will


violate the defendant’s rights under federal law, including the


United States Constitution;


2. The defendant:





Req. No. 2202 Page 9


a. has standing to assert the rights of a third party


under the tests for third-party standing established


by the United States Supreme Court, and


b. demonstrates that the imposition of civil liability on


the defendant will violate the third party’s rights


under federal law, including the United States


Constitution;


3. The imposition of civil liability on the defendant will


violate the defendant’s rights under the Oklahoma Constitution; or


4. The imposition of civil liability on the defendant will


violate limits on extraterritorial jurisdiction imposed by the


United States Constitution or the Oklahoma Constitution.


C. The defendant has the burden of proving an affirmative


defense under this section by a preponderance of the evidence.


D. The following are not defenses to an action brought under


Section 6 of this act:


1. A defendant’s ignorance or mistake of law, including a


defendant’s mistaken belief that the requirements or provisions of


this act are unconstitutional or were unconstitutional;


2. A defendant’s reliance on a court decision that has been


vacated, reversed, or overruled on appeal or by a subsequent court,


even if the court decision had not been vacated, reversed, or


overruled when the cause of action accrued;


3. A defendant’s reliance on a state or federal court decision

Req. No. 2202 Page 10


that is not binding on the court in which the action has been


brought;


4. A defendant’s reliance on a federal agency rule or action


that has been repealed, superseded, or declared invalid or


unconstitutional, even if the federal agency rule or action had not


been repealed, superseded, or declared invalid or unconstitutional


when the cause of action accrued;


5. The laws of another state or jurisdiction, including an


abortion shield law, unless the Oklahoma Constitution or federal law


compels the court to enforce that law;


6. Nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual claim preclusion;


7. Sovereign immunity, governmental immunity, or official


immunity, other than sovereign immunity, governmental immunity, or


official immunity applicable to:


a. a hospital owned, maintained, or operated by this


state that facilitates the availability of or makes


available abortion-inducing drugs solely for one or


more of the purposes described by subsection A of


Section 3 of this act,


b. a political subdivision of this state, including a


hospital district, that facilitates the availability


of or makes available abortion-inducing drugs solely


for one or more of the purposes described by


subsection A of Section 3 of this act, or

Req. No. 2202 Page 11


c. a health care provider employed by a hospital owned or


operated by this state or a political subdivision of


this state, including a hospital district, acting


within the scope of the provider’s employment who


prescribes, distributes, administers, or otherwise


makes available abortion-inducing drugs solely for one


or more of the purposes described by subsection A of


Section 3 of this act;


8. A claim that the enforcement of this act or the imposition


of civil liability against the defendant will violate the


constitutional or federally protected rights of third parties,


except as provided by subsection B of this section; or


9. Consent to the abortion by the claimant or the unborn


child’s mother.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.67 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Notwithstanding any other law, if a qui tam relator prevails


in an action brought under Section 6 of this act, the court shall


award to the relator:


1. Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant from


violating Section 4 of this act;


2. An amount not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars


($100,000.00) for each violation of Section 4 of this act; and

Req. No. 2202 Page 12


3. Costs and reasonable attorney fees.


B. A court may not award relief under paragraph 2 or 3 of


subsection A of this section in response to a violation of Section 4


of this act if the defendant demonstrates that:


1. A court previously ordered the defendant to pay an amount


under paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section in another action


for that particular violation; and


2. The court order described by paragraph 1 of this subsection


has not been vacated, reversed, or overturned.


C. A court may not award costs or attorney fees to a defendant


against whom an action is brought under Section 6 of this act.


D. Subsection C of this section does not preclude a court from


sanctioning a litigant or attorney for frivolous, malicious, or bad-


faith conduct.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.68 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This state, a political subdivision of this state, or an


officer or employee of this state or a political subdivision of this


state may not:


1. Act in concert or participation with a qui tam relator


bringing an action under Section 6 of this act;


2. Establish or attempt to establish any type of agency or


fiduciary relationship with a qui tam relator bringing an action

Req. No. 2202 Page 13


under Section 6 of this act;


3. Attempt to control or influence a person’s decision to bring


an action under Section 6 of this act or that person’s conduct of


the litigation; or


4. Intervene in an action brought under Section 6 of this act.


B. This section does not prohibit this state, a political


subdivision of this state, or an officer or employee of this state


or a political subdivision of this state from filing an amicus


curiae brief in an action brought under Section 6 of this act if


this state, the political subdivision, the officer, or the employee


does not act in concert or participation with the qui tam relator.


C. Notwithstanding any other law, a civil action under this


section shall not be subject to any provision of the Oklahoma


Citizens Participation Act, Section 1430 et seq. of Title 12 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, and shall not be subject to any provision of the


Oklahoma Religious Freedom Act, Section 251 et seq. of Title 51 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.69 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Notwithstanding any other law, the courts of this state have


personal jurisdiction over a defendant sued under Section 6 of this


act to the maximum extent permitted by the Fourteenth Amendment to


the United States Constitution, and the defendant may be served

Req. No. 2202 Page 14


outside this state.


B. Notwithstanding any other law, the law of this state applies


to an action brought under Section 6 of this act to the maximum


extent permitted by the Oklahoma Constitution and federal law,


including the United States Constitution.


C. Notwithstanding any other law, any contractual provision


that requires or purports to require application of the laws of a


different jurisdiction, or that requires or purports to require a


qui tam action under Section 6 of this act to be litigated in a


particular forum, is void based on this state’s public policy and is


not enforceable in any court.


D. Notwithstanding any other law, a court may not apply the law


of another state or jurisdiction to any qui tam action brought under


Section 6 of this act unless the Oklahoma Constitution or federal


law compels the court to apply that law.


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.70 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For purposes of this section, the term “clawback provision”


refers to any law of another state or jurisdiction that authorizes


the bringing of a civil action against a person for:


1. Bringing or engaging in an action authorized by this act,


including subsection F of this section;


2. Bringing or engaging in an action that alleges a violation

Req. No. 2202 Page 15


of Section 4 of this act;


3. Attempting, intending, or threatening to bring or engage in


an action described by paragraph 1 or 2 of this subsection; or


4. Providing legal representation or any type of assistance to


a person who brings or engages in an action described by paragraph 1


or 2 of this subsection.


B. Notwithstanding any other law and except as otherwise


provided by federal law or the Oklahoma Constitution, the laws of


this state apply to:


1. Conduct described by subsection A of this section;


2. An action brought against a person for engaging in conduct


described by subsection A of this section;


3. An action brought under a clawback provision against a


resident of this state; and


4. An action brought under subsection F of this section.


C. Notwithstanding any other law, in an action described by


paragraph 1 or 2 of subsection A of this section, the court shall,


on request, issue a temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunction


that restrains each defendant in the action, each person in privity


with the defendant, and each person with whom the defendant is in


active concert or participation from:


1. Bringing an action under any clawback provision against a


claimant or prosecutor, a person in privity with the claimant or


prosecutor, or a person providing legal representation or any type

Req. No. 2202 Page 16


of assistance to the claimant or prosecutor; and


2. Continuing to litigate an action under any clawback


provision that has been brought against a claimant or prosecutor, a


person in privity with the claimant or prosecutor, or a person


providing legal representation or any type of assistance to the


claimant or prosecutor.


D. Notwithstanding any other law, the doctrines of res judicata


and collateral estoppel preclude a defendant against whom a judgment


is entered in an action described by paragraph 1 or 2 of subsection


A of this section and each person in privity with the defendant from


litigating or relitigating any claim or issue under any clawback


provision against a claimant, prosecutor, or person in privity with


the claimant or prosecutor that was raised or could have been raised


as a claim, cross-claim, counterclaim, or affirmative defense under


the federal or this state’s rules of civil procedure.


E. Notwithstanding any other law, a court of this state may not


enforce an out-of-state judgment obtained in an action brought under


a clawback provision unless federal law or the Oklahoma Constitution


requires the court to enforce the judgment.


F. Notwithstanding any other law, if an action is brought or


judgment is entered against a person under a clawback provision


based wholly or partly on the person’s decision to engage in conduct


described by subsection A of this section, that person is entitled


to injunctive relief and damages from any person who brought the

Req. No. 2202 Page 17


action or obtained the judgment or who sought to enforce the


judgment. Notwithstanding any other law, the relief described by


this subsection must include:


1. Compensatory damages, including money damages in an amount


equal to the judgment damages and costs, expenses, and reasonable


attorney fees spent in defending the action;


2. Costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney fees incurred in


bringing an action under this subsection;


3. Additional amounts consisting of the greater of:


a. twice the sum of the damages, costs, expenses, and


fees described by paragraphs 1 and 2 of this


subsection, or


b. One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00); and


4. Injunctive relief that restrains each person who brought the


action under the clawback provision, each person in privity with the


person, and each person acting in concert or participation with the


person from:


a. bringing further actions under any clawback provision


against the person against whom the action was


brought, each person in privity with the person, or


any person providing legal representation or any type


of assistance to the person,





Req. No. 2202 Page 18


b. continuing to litigate any actions brought under a


clawback provision against the persons described by


subparagraph a of this paragraph, and


c. enforcing or attempting to enforce any judgment


obtained in any actions brought under a clawback


provision against the persons described by


subparagraph a of this paragraph.


G. It is not a defense to an action brought under subsection F


of this section that:


1. The claimant failed to seek recovery under subsection F of


this section in an action brought against the claimant under a


clawback provision; or


2. A court in a preceding action brought against the claimant


declined to recognize or enforce subsection F of this section or


held any provision of that subsection invalid, unconstitutional, or


preempted by federal law, notwithstanding the doctrines of issue or


claim preclusion.


H. Notwithstanding any other law, an action brought under


subsection F of this section shall not be subject to any provision


of the Oklahoma Citizens Participation Act, Section 1430 et seq. of


Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and shall not be subject to any


provision of the Oklahoma Religious Freedom Act, Section 251 et seq.


of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.



Req. No. 2202 Page 19


SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.71 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Notwithstanding any other law, the state shall have


sovereign immunity, each of its political subdivisions shall have


governmental immunity, and each officer and employee of this state


or a political subdivision shall have official immunity, as well as


sovereign or governmental immunity, as appropriate, in any action,


claim, counterclaim, or any type of legal or equitable action that


challenges the validity of any provision or application of this act,


on constitutional grounds or otherwise, or that seeks to prevent or


enjoin the state, its political subdivisions, or any officer or


employee of this state or a political subdivision from enforcing any


provision or application of this act, or from hearing, adjudicating,


or docketing an action brought under Section 6 or Section 7 of this


act, unless that immunity has been abrogated or preempted by federal


law in a manner consistent with the Constitution of the United


States. The sovereign immunity conferred by this section upon the


state and each of its officers and employees includes the


constitutional sovereign immunity recognized by the Supreme Court of


the United States in Seminole Tribe of Florida v. Florida, 517 U.S.


(1996), and Alden v. Maine, 527 U.S. 706 (1999), which applies in


both state and federal court and which may not be abrogated by


Congress or by any state or federal court except pursuant to

Req. No. 2202 Page 20


congressional legislation authorized by Section 5 of the Fourteenth


Amendment, by the Bankruptcy Clause of Article I, or by Congress’s


powers to raise and support Armies and to provide and maintain a


Navy, or by any other ground that might be recognized by the Supreme


Court of the United States.


B. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the


immunities conferred by subsection A of this section shall apply in


every court, both state and federal, and in every adjudicative


proceeding of any type whatsoever.


C. Notwithstanding any other law, no provision of state law may


be construed to waive or abrogate an immunity described in


subsection A of this section unless it expressly waives or abrogates


immunity with specific reference to this section.


D. Notwithstanding any other law, no attorney representing the


state, its political subdivisions, or any officer or employee of


this state or a political subdivision is authorized or permitted to


waive an immunity described in subsection A of this section or take


any action that would result in a waiver of that immunity, and any


such action or purported waiver shall be regarded as a legal nullity


and an ultra vires act.


E. Notwithstanding any other law, no court of this state may


award declaratory or injunctive relief, or any type of stay or writ,


including a writ of prohibition, that would pronounce any provision


or application of this act invalid or unconstitutional, or that

Req. No. 2202 Page 21


would restrain the state, its political subdivisions, any officer,


employee, or agent of this state or a political subdivision, or any


person from enforcing any provision or application of this act, or


from hearing, adjudicating, docketing, or filing an action brought


under Section 6 or Section 7 of this act, and no court of this state


shall have jurisdiction to consider any action, claim, or


counterclaim that seeks such relief, and no such action, claim, or


counterclaim may be litigated on behalf of a plaintiff or defendant


class, notwithstanding Section 2023 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma


Statutes and Rule 23 of the Oklahoma Rules of Civil Procedure, and


no court may certify a plaintiff or defendant class in any action


seeking the relief described in this subsection.


F. Nothing in this section or this act shall be construed to


prevent a litigant from asserting the invalidity or


unconstitutionality of any provision or application of this act as a


defense to any action, claim, or counterclaim brought against that


litigant.


SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-745.72 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Mindful of Brockett v. Spokane Arcades, Inc., 472 U.S. 491,


501, 506 & n.14 (1985), in which in the context of determining the


severability of a state statute the Supreme Court of the United


States held that an explicit statement of legislative intent is

Req. No. 2202 Page 22


controlling, even when the statute is attacked under the overbreadth


doctrine, it is the intent of the legislature that every single


provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word in


this section, and every single application of the every provision,


section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word in this act


to every discrete person, group of persons, or circumstances, are


severable from each other.


B. If any application of any provision, section, subsection,


sentence, clause, phrase, or word in this act to any person, group


of persons, or circumstances is found by a court to be invalid,


preempted, or unconstitutional, for any reason whatsoever, then the


remaining applications of that provision, section, subsection,


sentence, clause, phrase, or word to all other persons and


circumstances shall be severed and preserved, and shall remain in


effect. All constitutionally valid applications of the provisions,


sections, subsections, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words in this


act shall be severed from any applications that a court finds to be


invalid, preempted, or unconstitutional, because it is the


Legislature's intent and priority that every single valid


application of every provision, section, subsection, sentence,


clause, phrase, or word in this act be allowed to stand alone. Even


if the court concludes that a substantial number of the applications


of any provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or


word in this act are unconstitutional, judged in relation to its

Req. No. 2202 Page 23


plainly legitimate sweep, the applications of that provision,


section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word that do not


violate the Constitution shall be severed from the remaining


applications and shall remain in force, and shall be treated as if


the Legislature had enacted a provision, section, subsection,


sentence, clause, phrase, or word limited to the persons, groups of


persons, or circumstances for which its application does not violate


the Constitution.


C. The Legislature further declares that it would have enacted


this act, and each provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause,


phrase, or word, and all constitutional applications of the


provisions, sections, subsections, sentences, clauses, phrases, and


words of this act, irrespective of the fact that any provision,


section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word, or any


applications of the provisions, sections, subsections, sentences,


clauses, phrases, and words of this act, were to be declared


invalid, preempted, or unconstitutional.


D. If any provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause,


phrase, or word of this of this act is found by any court to be


unconstitutionally vague, then the applications of that provision,


section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word that do not


present constitutional vagueness problems shall be severed and


remain in force, consistent with the severability requirements of


subsections A, B, and C of this section.

Req. No. 2202 Page 24


E. No court may decline to enforce the severability


requirements of subsections A, B, C, and D of this section on the


ground that severance would “rewrite” the statute or involve the


court in legislative or lawmaking activity. A court that declines


to enforce or enjoins a state official from enforcing a statutory


provision is never rewriting a statute or engaging in legislative or


lawmaking activity, as the statute continues to contain the same


words as before the court's decision. A judicial injunction or


declaration of unconstitutionality:


1. Is nothing more than an edict prohibiting enforcement of the


disputed statute against the named parties to that lawsuit, which


may subsequently be vacated by a later court if that court has a


different understanding of the requirements of the Oklahoma


Constitution or United States Constitution;


2. Is not a formal amendment of the language in a statute; and


3. No more rewrites a statute than a decision by the executive


not to enforce a duly enacted statute in a limited and defined set


of circumstances.


F. If any state or federal court disregards any of the


severability requirements in subsections A, B, C, D, or E of this


section, and declares or finds any provision, section, subsection,


sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act facially invalid,


preempted, or unconstitutional, when there are discrete applications


of that provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or

Req. No. 2202 Page 25


word can be enforced against a person, group of persons, or


circumstances without violating federal law or the federal or state


constitutions, then that provision, section, subsection, sentence,


clause, phrase, or word shall be interpreted, as a matter of state


law, as if the legislature had enacted a provision, section,


subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word limited to the


persons, group of persons, or circumstances for which its


application will not violate federal law or the federal or state


constitutions, and every court and every state official shall adopt


this saving construction of that provision, section, subsection,


sentence, clause, phrase, or word until the court ruling that


pronounced the provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause,


phrase, or word facially invalid, preempted, or unconstitutional is


vacated or overruled.


SECTION 14. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2202 DC 1/15/2026 11:18:01 AM









Req. No. 2202 Page 26